Utah statutes.
34A-2-421.   Lump-sum payments.

An administrative law judge, under special circumstances and when the same is deemed advisable, may commute periodic benefits to one or more lump-sum payments.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 375, 1997 General Session

